Illinois, session 104th, HB1301.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Rural 5Hospital Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Between January 2013 and February 2020, over 100 8    rural hospitals closed in Illinois.9        (2) Rural hospitals struggle for several reasons:10            (A) low patient volume;11            (B) high fixed costs; and12            (C) a greater reliance on public payers than 13        privately insured patients.14        (3) A task force to investigate the current state of 15    rural hospitals and to provide legislative action could 16    prevent further closures and expand services. 17    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:18    "Rural hospital" has the meaning given in subsection (d) 19of Section 8 of the Hospital Licensing Act.20    "Task Force" means the Rural Hospital Task Force 21established under this Act.   HB1301- 2 -LRB104 06753 BDA 16789 b1    Section 15. Rural Hospital Task Force.2    (a) The Rural Hospital Task Force is created within the 3Department of Public Health. The purpose of this Task Force is 4to investigate the current state of rural hospitals and to 5provide recommendations to prevent further closures of rural 6hospitals and to potentially expand services provided by rural 7hospitals.8    (b) The Task Force shall be composed of the following 9members:10        (1) the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the 11    Speaker's designee;12        (2) the President of the Senate or the President's 13    designee;14        (3) the Minority Leader of the House of 15    Representatives or the Minority Leader's designee;16        (4) the Minority Leader of the Senate or the Minority 17    Leader's designee;18        (5) one member appointed by the Director of Public 19    Health;20        (6) one member appointed by the Director of Financial 21    and Professional Regulation;22        (7) one member appointed by the Director of Healthcare 23    and Family Services;24        (8) one member appointed by the Director of Aging;25        (9) one member representing the Illinois Rural Health 26    Association, appointed by the Governor; and  HB1301- 3 -LRB104 06753 BDA 16789 b1        (10) one member representing the Illinois Health and 2    Hospital Association, appointed by the Governor.3    (b) The Task Force shall convene to conduct business on at 4least 4 separate days, the first of which shall be held within 530 days after the members of the Task Force have been 6appointed.7    (c) The members of the Task Force shall serve without 8compensation but shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and 9necessary expenses from funds appropriated for that purpose.10    (d) The Department of Public Health shall provide 11administrative and other support to the Task Force. Each 12agency and entity represented on the Task Force shall share 13with the Task Force any data of the agency or entity necessary 14to achieve the purpose of the Task Force under this Act. 15    Section 20. Task Force deadline; repeal. 16    (a) All findings and recommendations made by the Task 17Force must be reported to the General Assembly before January 181, 2027.19    (b) The Task Force is dissolved, and this Act is repealed, 20on January 1, 2027.